Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 5
STATEWIDE MONEY PURCHASE PLAN

31-31-501. Withdrawal into statewide money purchase plan.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until January 1, 2023.] Any employer may withdraw from its participation in the statewide defined benefit plan established by part 4 of this article for the sole purpose of electing participation in the statewide money purchase plan created pursuant to the authority granted in section 31-31-502.

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

Any employer may withdraw from its participation in the statewide retirement plan established by article 31.5 of this title 31 for the sole purpose of electing participation in the statewide money purchase plan created pursuant to the authority granted in section 31-31-502.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until January 1, 2023.]

The employer may initiate withdrawal from the statewide defined benefit plan by filing with the board a resolution adopted by the employer pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (2) no less than nine months prior to the effective date of withdrawal unless a shorter waiting period is approved by the board. The effective date of withdrawal shall be the first day of the month immediately following the month in which the waiting period expires.

The employer's withdrawal resolution shall be adopted by the governing body of the employer and shall state the employer's intent to withdraw from participation in the statewide defined benefit plan for the purpose of electing participation in the statewide money purchase plan.

Any withdrawal shall be approved by at least sixty-five percent of all active members employed by the employer who are participating in the statewide defined benefit plan at the time of the election and who vote in the election proposing the withdrawal.

The board shall promulgate rules relating to standards for disclosure of all ramifications and procedures for obtaining the member approval provided for in paragraph (c) of this subsection (2).

All withdrawals from the statewide defined benefit plan shall comply with the requirements set forth in this section, and, except as otherwise provided in this section, all withdrawals meeting such requirements shall be approved by the board. Withdrawal requests that do not meet the requirements of this section shall not be approved by the board.

(2) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective January 1, 2023.]

(a) The employer may initiate withdrawal from the statewide retirement plan by filing with the board a resolution adopted by the employer pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section no less than nine months prior to the effective date of withdrawal unless a shorter waiting period is approved by the board. The effective date of withdrawal shall be the first day of the month immediately following the month in which the waiting period expires.

(b) The employer's withdrawal resolution shall be adopted by the governing body of the employer and shall state the employer's intent to withdraw from participation in the statewide retirement plan for the purpose of electing participation in the statewide money purchase plan.

(c) Any withdrawal shall be approved by at least sixty-five percent of all active members employed by the employer who are participating in the statewide retirement plan at the time of the election and who vote in the election proposing the withdrawal.

(d) The board shall promulgate rules relating to standards for disclosure of all ramifications and procedures for obtaining the member approval provided for in subsection (2)(c) of this section.

(e) All withdrawals from the statewide retirement plan shall comply with the requirements set forth in this section, and, except as otherwise provided in this section, all withdrawals meeting such requirements shall be approved by the board. Withdrawal requests that do not meet the requirements of this section shall not be approved by the board.

The rights of benefit recipients and the vested rights of inactive members shall not be impaired or reduced in any manner as a result of the withdrawal of an employer as provided in this section.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(a)(I) is effective until January 1, 2023.] The board shall determine the amount of reserves required as of the effective date of withdrawal to maintain current benefits payable by the association to benefit recipients and to preserve the vested rights of inactive members. The amount of reserves shall be determined by the board utilizing certified actuarial reports prepared by the actuary for the statewide defined benefit plan. Any such actuarial report shall also certify that the employer's withdrawal shall not have an adverse financial impact on the actuarial soundness of the new hire benefits account. If the actuary determines, in accordance with accepted actuarial principles, that the withdrawal will not have an adverse financial impact on the actuarial soundness of the new hire benefits account, the board shall transfer such employer's share of the employer contribution reserve in the new hire benefits account, as determined by the actuary, and all member contributions for the employer's active members to a short-term investment account. If the actuary determines, in accordance with accepted actuarial principles, that the withdrawal shall have an adverse financial impact on the actuarial soundness of the new hire benefits account, the employer shall not be permitted to withdraw.

At least sixty days prior to the effective date of the withdrawal, the actuarial reports shall be updated and appropriate adjustments made to the amount of reserves transferred by the board to the short-term investment account on behalf of the employer if an update is required pursuant to rules adopted by the board. Within thirty days after the receipt of such updated reports, the withdrawal may be terminated by either:

The employer filing with the board a subsequent resolution revoking the employer's resolution of intent to withdraw; or

More than thirty-five percent of the employer's active members who are eligible to vote filing with the board ballots indicating that they no longer wish to withdraw.

If a resolution or a sufficient number of ballots is timely filed with the board pursuant to subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), the withdrawal shall be terminated, and the board shall return to the new hire benefits account any amounts transferred to the short-term investment account pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a). If no resolution or an insufficient number of ballots is timely filed, the withdrawal shall proceed in accordance with the provisions of this section.

The board shall prescribe the form of the ballot to be submitted by members indicating that they no longer wish to withdraw and any other rules necessary for the implementation of this subsection (4).

(4)

(a) (I) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(a)(I) is effective January 1, 2023.] The board shall determine the amount of reserves required as of the effective date of withdrawal to maintain current benefits payable by the association to benefit recipients and to preserve the vested rights of inactive members. The amount of reserves shall be determined by the board utilizing certified actuarial reports prepared by the actuary for the statewide retirement plan. Any such actuarial report shall also certify that the employer's withdrawal shall not have an adverse financial impact on the actuarial soundness of the new hire benefits account. If the actuary determines, in accordance with accepted actuarial principles, that the withdrawal will not have an adverse financial impact on the actuarial soundness of the new hire benefits account, the board shall transfer such employer's share of the employer contribution reserve in the new hire benefits account, as determined by the actuary, and all member contributions for the employer's active members to a short-term investment account. If the actuary determines, in accordance with accepted actuarial principles, that the withdrawal shall have an adverse financial impact on the actuarial soundness of the new hire benefits account, the employer shall not be permitted to withdraw.

On the effective date of withdrawal, the actuarial reports prepared pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall be updated to finalize the amount of reserves required for the purposes specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4).

Expenses incurred by the board for the actuarial reports prepared as a result of an application for withdrawal shall be paid by the employer making such application.

The board shall provide any information contained in such actuarial reports upon request of the employer making the application for withdrawal.

In the event that the amount of the reserves required pursuant to the provisions of subsection (4) of this section exceeds the amount of the employer's share of the employer contribution reserve in the new hire benefits account as calculated by the actuary, the employer shall make an additional payment no later than ten working days after the effective date of withdrawal in an amount equal to the difference between the amount of reserves required and the amount of reserves on deposit.

In the event that the amount of the reserves on deposit in the new hire benefits account, as calculated by the actuary, for the employer making application for withdrawal, exceeds the amount of reserves required pursuant to the provisions of subsection (4) of this section, such excess amount and the amount required for the transfer of member contributions as provided in subsection (6) of this section shall be transferred to the fire and police members' statewide money purchase plan benefit trust fund on the effective date of withdrawal. Allocation of such amounts to individual member accounts under the statewide money purchase plan shall be made as set forth in section 31-31-502.

The payments required by this section are subject to interest if not submitted when due.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (6)(a) is effective until January 1, 2023.] Members who are not vested under the statewide defined benefit plan and who are employed by an employer who has withdrawn from the statewide defined benefit plan shall have their member contributions credited to the statewide money purchase pension plan as set forth in section 31-31-502.

(6)

(a) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (6)(a) is effective January 1, 2023.] Members who are not vested under the statewide retirement plan and who are employed by an employer who has withdrawn from the statewide retirement plan shall have their member contributions credited to the statewide money purchase pension plan as set forth in section 31-31-502.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (6)(b)(I) is effective until January 1, 2023.] Members who are vested under the statewide defined benefit plan and who are employed by an employer who has filed a resolution of intent to withdraw from the statewide defined benefit plan may elect that, if the withdrawal becomes effective, their contributions remain with the statewide defined benefit plan by giving written notice to the association no later than the date established for completion of the member election provided in paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (6)(b)(II) is effective until January 1, 2023.] Members who have made such an election shall become inactive statewide defined benefit plan members entitled to vested benefits upon termination and attainment of vested retirement age.

(II)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (6)(b)(II) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

Members who have made such an election shall become inactive statewide retirement plan members entitled to vested benefits upon termination and attainment of vested retirement age.

Members who have made such an election shall not be entitled to withdraw any amounts from their separate retirement account until they have terminated their current employment.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (6)(b)(IV) is effective until January 1, 2023.] If members who have made such an election die or become disabled prior to termination of employment, neither they nor their survivors shall be eligible for benefits under the statewide defined benefit plan, but rather they shall be limited to those benefits provided in sections 31-31-803, 31-31-807, and 31-31-807.5.

(IV)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (6)(b)(IV) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

If members who have made such an election die or become disabled prior to termination of employment, neither they nor their survivors shall be eligible for benefits under the statewide retirement plan, but rather they shall be limited to those benefits provided in sections 31-31-803, 31-31-807, and 31-31-807.5.

(b) (I)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (6)(b)(I) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

Members who are vested under the statewide retirement plan and who are employed by an employer who has filed a resolution of intent to withdraw from the statewide retirement plan may elect that, if the withdrawal becomes effective, their contributions remain with the statewide retirement plan by giving written notice to the association no later than the date established for completion of the member election provided in subsection (2)(c) of this section.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (6)(c) is effective until January 1, 2023.] Members who do not elect to leave their contributions with the statewide defined benefit plan pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (6) shall have their member contributions credited to the statewide money purchase pension plan as set forth in section 31-31-502.

(c)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (6)(c) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

Members who do not elect to leave their contributions with the statewide retirement plan pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section shall have their member contributions credited to the statewide money purchase pension plan as set forth in section 31-31-502.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (7) is effective until January 1, 2023.] The provisions of section 31-31-404 (1)(b) that relate to the purchase of service credit forfeited by the refund of member contributions shall not apply to members who are employees of an employer that has withdrawn from the statewide defined benefit plan. Such service credit forfeited by such withdrawal may be purchased pursuant to the provisions of section 31-31-403 (7).

(7)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (7) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

The provisions of sections 31-31-404 (1)(b) and 31-31.5-411 (1)(b) that relate to the purchase of service credit forfeited by the refund of member contributions shall not apply to members who are employees of an employer that has withdrawn from the statewide defined benefit plan. Such service credit forfeited by such withdrawal may be purchased pursuant to the provisions of section 31-31-403 (7) or 31-31.5-310.

Source:

L. 96

Entire article added with relocations, p. 914, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

(6)(b)(IV) amended, p. 62, § 2, effective February 8, 1999.

L. 2001:

(2)(a), (2)(d), and IP(4)(a)(II) amended, p. 420, § 7, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

(5)(b) amended, p. 194, § 18, effective March 31.

L. 2015:

(5)(c) amended, (SB 15-027), ch. 9, p. 21, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

(2)(c) amended, (SB 17-020), ch. 23, p. 69, § 1, effective March 8.

L. 2022:

(1), (2), (4)(a)(I), (6)(a), (6)(b)(I), (6)(b)(II), (6)(b)(IV), (6)(c), and (7) amended, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 305, § 8, effective January 1, 2023.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1003.1.

31-31-502. Statewide money purchase plan - creation - management.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until January 1, 2023.] The board shall develop, maintain, and amend a statewide money purchase plan document that is intended to comply with the qualification requirements specified in section 401 of the internal revenue code, as applicable to governmental plans. As used in this subsection (1), "internal revenue code" shall have that meaning set forth in section 31-31-204 (3). The plan shall cover the members of those employers that have withdrawn from the statewide defined benefit plan pursuant to section 31-31-501.

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

The board shall develop, maintain, and amend a statewide money purchase plan document that is intended to comply with the qualification requirements specified in section 401 of the internal revenue code, as applicable to governmental plans. As used in this subsection (1), "internal revenue code" shall have that meaning set forth in section 31-31-204 (3). The plan shall cover the members of those employers that have withdrawn from the statewide retirement plan pursuant to section 31-31-501.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(a) is effective until January 1, 2023.] There is hereby created the fire and police members' statewide money purchase plan benefit trust fund, which shall consist of moneys of employers that have withdrawn from the statewide defined benefit plan pursuant to section 31-31-501, including member and employer contributions and such amounts as are transferred pursuant to section 31-31-501. The board shall keep an accurate account of the fund and of each member's separate account in the fund.

(2)

(a) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(a) is effective January 1, 2023.] There is hereby created the fire and police members' statewide money purchase plan benefit trust fund, which shall consist of moneys of employers that have withdrawn from the statewide retirement plan pursuant to section 31-31-501, including member and employer contributions and such amounts as are transferred pursuant to section 31-31-501. The board shall keep an accurate account of the fund and of each member's separate account in the fund.

The plan document created by the board pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall govern the calculation and allocation of earnings and losses under the various investment alternatives which the board may offer, the transfer of assets between funds under each alternative, the allocation of a member's account between investment alternatives, and such other matters as may be necessary to the board's administration and management of the fund created pursuant to this section.

In its administration, investment, and management of the fire and police members' statewide money purchase plan benefit trust fund, the board shall be subject to the provisions of section 31-31-303.

Each member's member contributions transferred to the fund pursuant to section 31-31-501 (5)(b) shall be allocated to the member's separate account within the fund. In addition, each member's separate account will be credited with a portion of any excess employer reserve that is transferred to the fund, such amount to be calculated by multiplying the excess employer reserve times the proportion that the member's transferred member contributions bears to the total member contributions transferred.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(a) is effective until January 1, 2023.] Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (4), upon the effective date of an employer's withdrawal from the statewide defined benefit plan and election to participate in the statewide money purchase plan, each member covered by the statewide money purchase plan shall pay into the fund eight percent of salary paid. The payment shall be made by the employer by deduction from the salary paid such member. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (4), for each such member, the employer shall pay into the fund eight percent of the salary paid to such member. All such payments shall be made by one voucher for the aggregate amount and shall be made no later than ten days following the date of payment of salary to the member. All such payments shall be credited to the fund. Late payments are subject to the penalty set forth in section 31-31-402 (4).

(4)

(a) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(a) is effective January 1, 2023.] Except as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section, upon the effective date of an employer's withdrawal from the statewide retirement plan and election to participate in the statewide money purchase plan, each member covered by the statewide money purchase plan shall pay into the fund eight percent of salary paid. The payment shall be made by the employer by deduction from the salary paid such member. Except as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section, for each such member, the employer shall pay into the fund eight percent of the salary paid to such member. All such payments shall be made by one voucher for the aggregate amount and shall be made no later than ten days following the date of payment of salary to the member. All such payments shall be credited to the fund. Late payments are subject to the penalty set forth in section 31-31.5-309.

Upon the request of an employer, the board shall permit a higher mandatory employer contribution rate, mandatory employee contribution rate, or both, than is set forth in subsection (4)(a) of this section if the board determines that:

A local resolution or ordinance setting forth the higher mandatory contribution rate or rates was enacted and is in effect; and

An employee election was conducted and the higher mandatory contribution rate or rates was approved by sixty-five percent of the employer's active members of the plan who vote in the election proposing the higher rate.

Any active member and any employer may make voluntary contributions to the plan by payroll deduction. Voluntary member contributions are not subject to the employer pickup provisions of section 414 (h) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended.

In no event shall increased contributions resulting from a higher contribution rate or rates cause a member to exceed the limit on annual additions under the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, as applicable to government plans.

The board may amend the pension benefits provided under the statewide money purchase plan document created pursuant to subsection (1) of this section only upon the approval of at least sixty-five percent of the active members of the plan who vote in the election proposing the plan amendment and more than fifty percent of the employers who vote in the election proposing the plan amendment and who have active members covered by the plan, each employer to be assigned one vote; except that employers having both active police and fire members in the plan shall be assigned two votes; and except that the board may amend the plan document, without further approval, as it deems prudent and necessary to comply with state and federal law or as it deems necessary to efficiently administer benefits under the plan.

Any employer who has established a local money purchase plan pursuant to part 6 of this article or article 30.5 may apply to the board to cover the members of its local money purchase plan under the statewide money purchase plan. An application may be initiated by filing with the board a resolution adopted by the employer pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (6) no less than six months prior to the proposed effective date of coverage under the statewide money purchase plan, unless a shorter waiting period is approved by the board. The effective date of coverage shall be the first day of the month following the waiting period.

The employer's resolution applying for coverage under the statewide money purchase plan shall be adopted by the governing body of the employer and shall state the employer's intent to cover the members of its local money purchase plan under the statewide money purchase plan.

Any application for coverage under the statewide money purchase plan shall be approved by at least sixty-five percent of all active members employed by the employer who are participating in the local money purchase plan at the time of the application and who vote in the election proposing the coverage under the statewide money purchase plan.

The board shall promulgate rules relating to standards for disclosure of all ramifications and procedures for obtaining the member approval described in paragraph (c) of this subsection (6). The board shall also promulgate rules relating to standards for granting an employer's application for participation in the statewide money purchase plan and for the submission of information to the board by the employer.

An application for coverage under the statewide money purchase plan shall not be complete until the employer certifies to the board that:

The employer's local money purchase plan meets the qualification requirements of section 401 (a) of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986" that are applicable to governmental plans;

In connection with the employer's resolution pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (6), the employer's governing body has adopted a resolution for complete or partial termination of the local money purchase plan in accordance with the terms of that plan and that:

The termination resolution does not adversely affect the qualified status of the local money purchase plan; and

The rights of all participants in the local money purchase plan who are affected by the termination to benefits accrued to the date of termination are nonforfeitable;

All active and retired fire and police participants in the local money purchase plan will become participants in the statewide money purchase plan;

As directed by the board, the employer will transfer or cause to be transferred to the statewide money purchase plan all assets of the local money purchase plan that are attributable to the accrued benefits of the transferred participants;

All employer and employee contributions required to be made to the local money purchase plan as of the date of termination have been paid;

Participants in the local money purchase plan will not incur a reduction in their respective accrued benefits, determined as of the date of transfer, as a result of their transfer to the statewide money purchase plan; and

The employer agrees to participate in the statewide money purchase plan and to be bound by the terms of the plan and the decisions and actions of the board with respect to the plan.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 917, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 13, § 4, effective March 13.

L. 2000:

(4) and (5) amended, p. 53, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2006:

(1), (2)(a), and (2)(c) amended, p. 194, § 19, effective March 31.

L. 2007:

(4)(a) amended, p. 274, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2012:

(5) amended, (HB 12-1031), ch. 68, p. 236, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2017:

IP(4)(b)(I), (4)(b)(I)(B), (5), and (6)(c) amended, (SB 17-020), ch. 23, p. 69, § 2, effective March 8.

L. 2022:

(1), (2)(a), and (4)(a) amended, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 307, § 9, effective January 1, 2023.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1005.3.